Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh H.F. 2466 DIVISION I 1 SHORT TITLE 2 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 3 cited as the âIowa Skilled Workforce Actâ. 4 DIVISION II 5 IOWA REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP ACT 6 Sec. 2. Section 84D.2, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 5. âApprenticeship sponsorâ means an entity operating 9 an apprenticeship program or an entity in whose name an 10 apprenticeship program is being operated, which entity is 11 registered with or approved by the United States department 12 of labor, office of apprenticeship, or the Iowa office of 13 apprenticeship. âApprenticeship sponsorâ includes a lead 14 apprenticeship sponsor, sponsor, or intermediary sponsor , and 15 an employer who provides training through a lead apprenticeship 16 sponsor, sponsor, or intermediary sponsor . 17 Sec. 3. Section 84D.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsections: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 11A. âEmployer partnerâ means an employer 20 who trains the employerâs employees through an intermediary 21 sponsor. 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 12A. âIntermediary sponsorâ means 23 an entity that provides related training instruction to 24 apprentices for multiple employers, serves as the sponsor of 25 the apprentices, and registers the program with the Iowa office 26 of apprenticeship, and may also provide technical assistance to 27 employers and assist with developing occupational standards. 28 Sec. 4. Section 84D.2, subsection 12, Code 2026, is amended 29 by striking the subsection. 30 Sec. 5. Section 84D.2, subsection 19, paragraph a, 31 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (c), Code 2026, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 (c) Related training instruction from a lead apprenticeship 34 sponsor, sponsor, or intermediary sponsor . 35 -1- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 1/ 17 H.F. 2466 Sec. 6. Section 84D.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 1 by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. An intermediary sponsor has the sole 3 discretion for approving employer partners, provided that such 4 employer partners are compliant with the employer partnersâ 5 responsibilities outlined in the intermediary sponsorâs 6 standards. 7 Sec. 7. Section 84D.4, subsection 8, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 8. a. The office shall develop a plan providing a procedure 10 for the cancellation or deregistration, or both, of programs 11 and for temporary suspension, cancellation, deregistration, or 12 any of these, of apprenticeship agreements. 13 b. The office shall not cancel, suspend, or deregister an 14 intermediary sponsor based on the actions of the intermediary 15 sponsorâs employer partners. However, the office may require 16 an intermediary sponsor to cancel or suspend an employer 17 partner due to the employer partnerâs material breach of 18 responsibilities as outlined in the intermediary sponsorâs 19 standards. Prior to any order to cancel or suspend an employer 20 partner, the office must provide a comprehensive list of the 21 grounds for cancellation or suspension and allow at least sixty 22 days for the employer partner to become compliant. If the 23 office orders cancellation or suspension of an employer partner 24 after the sixty-day period, the order shall be considered final 25 agency action, and the intermediary sponsor may seek judicial 26 review as provided in section 17A.19. 27 c. (1) The office may only cancel, suspend, or deregister 28 an approved apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary sponsor, 29 or lead apprenticeship sponsor due to a material breach of 30 the requirements of this chapter. Prior to any permanent 31 or temporary cancellation, suspension, or deregistration, 32 the office must provide a comprehensive list of the grounds 33 of the alleged material breach in writing to the approved 34 apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary sponsor, or lead 35 -2- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 2/ 17 H.F. 2466 apprenticeship sponsor and allow at least ninety days to become 1 compliant. 2 (2) A decision by the office to cancel, suspend, or 3 deregister an approved apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary 4 sponsor, or lead apprenticeship sponsor must be issued in 5 writing and must state the reasons for the officeâs decision. 6 The office shall not issue such a decision before the 7 conclusion of the ninety-day period or later than thirty days 8 after the conclusion of the period. The decision shall be 9 considered final agency action subject to judicial review as 10 provided in section 17A.19. However, notwithstanding section 11 17A.19, the office shall have the burden to prove that the 12 approved apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary sponsor, or lead 13 apprenticeship sponsor materially breached this chapter and 14 that the breach continued past the ninety-day period. 15 d. If an apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary sponsor, 16 or lead apprenticeship sponsor is canceled, suspended, or 17 deregistered, the apprenticeship sponsor, intermediary sponsor, 18 or lead apprenticeship sponsor shall have the right to reapply 19 for a registration after sixty days. 20 Sec. 8. Section 84D.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 84D.7 Requirements for sponsors and employers. 23 A sponsor of a quality pre-apprenticeship program, 24 youth apprenticeship program, registered apprenticeship 25 program, or apprenticeship program is responsible for the 26 administration and supervision of on-the-job training and 27 related technical instruction for each apprentice in the 28 quality pre-apprenticeship program, youth apprenticeship 29 program, registered apprenticeship program, or apprenticeship 30 program. When training is provided by a lead apprenticeship 31 sponsor or intermediary sponsor , the employer of the apprentice 32 is responsible for the administration and supervision of 33 on-the-job training, and the lead apprenticeship sponsor or 34 intermediary sponsor is responsible for related technical 35 -3- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 3/ 17 H.F. 2466 instruction for each apprenticeship. 1 DIVISION III 2 IOWA PLUMBER, MECHANICAL PROFESSIONAL, AND CONTRACTOR LICENSING 3 ACT ââ APPRENTICESHIPS 4 Sec. 9. Section 105.18, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 5 following new subsection: 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. Regulation of apprenticeships. 7 a. A licensed journeyperson or master may employ or 8 supervise licensed apprentices at a ratio not to exceed three 9 apprentices to one licensee. 10 b. The requirements of this section do not apply to 11 apprenticeship classroom training. 12 DIVISION IV 13 IOWA APPRENTICESHIP ACT 14 Sec. 10. Section 84E.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 15 following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 8A. âIntermediary sponsorâ means the same 17 as defined in section 84D.2. 18 Sec. 11. Section 84E.4, subsections 1, 2, 3, and 4, Code 19 2026, are amended to read as follows: 20 1. a. An apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or 21 lead apprenticeship sponsor that conducts an apprenticeship 22 program that is registered with the United States department of 23 labor, office of apprenticeship, through Iowa, for apprentices 24 who will be employed at worksites located in this state may 25 apply to the department for financial assistance under this 26 section if the apprenticeship program includes a minimum of one 27 hundred contact hours per apprentice for each training year of 28 the apprenticeship program. 29 b. Financial assistance received by an apprenticeship 30 sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or lead apprenticeship 31 sponsor under this section shall be used only for the cost of 32 conducting and maintaining an apprenticeship program. 33 c. An apprenticeship sponsor whose apprentices receive 34 contact hours from a lead apprenticeship sponsor is not 35 -4- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 4/ 17 H.F. 2466 eligible for financial assistance under this chapter. 1 2. The department shall provide financial assistance in the 2 form of training grants to eligible apprenticeship sponsors , 3 intermediary sponsors, or lead apprenticeship sponsors in the 4 following manner: 5 a. By determining the total amount of funding allocated 6 for purposes of training grants for apprenticeship programs 7 pursuant to section 84E.3 . 8 b. By determining the total number of apprentices trained 9 during the most recent training year, as calculated on the 10 last day of the training year, in all apprenticeship programs 11 conducted by all applying apprenticeship sponsors , intermediary 12 sponsors, or lead apprenticeship sponsors eligible to apply for 13 financial assistance under subsection 1 . 14 c. By determining the total number of apprentices trained 15 during the most recent training year, as calculated on the 16 last day of the training year, in each apprenticeship program 17 conducted by each apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary 18 sponsor, or lead apprenticeship sponsor eligible to apply under 19 subsection 1 , and that applied for financial assistance under 20 subsection 1 . 21 d. By determining the proportion, stated as a percentage, 22 that each applying apprenticeship sponsorâs , intermediary 23 sponsorâs, or lead apprenticeship sponsorâs total calculated 24 pursuant to paragraph âcâ bears to all applying apprenticeship 25 sponsorsâ , intermediary sponsorsâ, or lead apprenticeship 26 sponsorsâ total calculated pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 27 e. By multiplying the percentage calculated in paragraph âdâ 28 by the amount determined in paragraph âaâ . 29 3. An apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or 30 lead apprenticeship sponsor seeking financial assistance under 31 this section shall provide the following information to the 32 department: 33 a. The federal apprentice registration number of each 34 apprentice in the apprenticeship program. 35 -5- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 5/ 17 H.F. 2466 b. The address and a description of the physical location 1 where in-person training is conducted. 2 c. A certification of the apprenticeship sponsorâs or 3 intermediary sponsorâs training standards as most recently 4 approved by the United States department of labor, office 5 of apprenticeship or, in the case of a lead apprenticeship 6 sponsor, a representative sample of participating membersâ 7 training standards. 8 d. A certification of the apprenticeship sponsorâs or 9 intermediary sponsorâs compliance review or quality assessment 10 as most recently conducted by the United States department of 11 labor, office of apprenticeship, unless the apprenticeship 12 sponsor has not been subjected to a compliance review or 13 quality assessment. In the case of a lead apprenticeship 14 sponsor, a sampling of compliance reviews or quality 15 assessments from participating members shall be sufficient. 16 e. Any other information the department reasonably 17 determines is necessary. 18 4. The apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary sponsor, or 19 lead apprenticeship sponsor and the department shall enter 20 into an agreement regarding the provision of any financial 21 assistance to the apprenticeship sponsor , intermediary sponsor, 22 or lead apprenticeship sponsor. 23 Sec. 12. Section 84G.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023 2026 , 26 and for each fiscal year thereafter, there is annually 27 appropriated from the workforce development fund account to 28 the apprenticeship training program fund created in section 29 84E.3 three four million five hundred thousand dollars for the 30 purposes of chapter 84E . 31 DIVISION V 32 CAREER TRAINING PHYSICAL EXPANSION PROGRAM ââ FUNDING OF 33 CERTAIN DEGREE PROGRAMS AT REGENTS INSTITUTIONS 34 Sec. 13. Section 84A.5, subsection 5, Code 2026, is amended 35 -6- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 6/ 17 H.F. 2466 by adding the following new paragraph: 1 NEW PARAGRAPH . m. The career training physical expansion 2 program under chapter 84J. 3 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 84J.1 Definition. 4 As used in this chapter, âdepartmentâ means the department of 5 workforce development. 6 Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 84J.2 Career training physical 7 expansion program. 8 1. A career training physical expansion program is created 9 that shall be administered by the department. The purpose 10 of the program is to provide financial assistance for the 11 construction of new facilities that will expand the capacity 12 of community colleges and unionized and nonunionized private 13 sector apprenticeship programs to provide education and 14 training for workers in high-demand fields in this state. 15 2. The department shall establish eligibility requirements, 16 award criteria, and application and other necessary procedures 17 for the program. To be eligible for financial assistance, a 18 community college or apprenticeship program must demonstrate 19 to the department that construction of the new facility will 20 directly result in an increase in the number of workers in 21 high-demand fields in this state by expanding the physical 22 capacity of the community college or apprenticeship program to 23 train more students or apprentices in such fields. Projects 24 to increase internet-based education or training shall be 25 ineligible for financial assistance. 26 Sec. 16. NEW SECTION . 84J.3 Career training physical 27 expansion program fund. 28 1. A career training physical expansion program fund is 29 created as a fund in the state treasury under the control of 30 the department. 31 2. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated for 32 purposes of the career training physical expansion program, 33 and any other moneys lawfully available to the department for 34 purposes of this chapter. 35 -7- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 7/ 17 H.F. 2466 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department for 1 the purposes of this chapter. 2 4. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the fund at 3 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall 4 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 5 for subsequent fiscal years. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, 6 subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall 7 be credited to the fund. 8 Sec. 17. NEW SECTION . 84J.4 Rules. 9 The department of workforce development shall adopt rules 10 pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this chapter. 11 DIVISION VI 12 DEPARTMENT-APPROVED TRAINING 13 Sec. 18. Section 96.4, subsection 6, paragraph a, Code 2026, 14 is amended to read as follows: 15 a. (1) An otherwise eligible individual shall not be denied 16 benefits for any week because the individual is in training 17 with the approval of the director, nor shall the individual 18 be denied benefits with respect to any week in which the 19 individual is in training with the approval of the director by 20 reason of the application of the provision in subsection 3 of 21 this section relating to availability for work, and an active 22 search for work or the provision of section 96.5, subsection 23 3 , relating to failure to apply for or a refusal to accept 24 suitable work. However, an employerâs account shall not be 25 charged with benefits so paid. 26 (2) The director shall not deny approval of training that 27 otherwise qualifies for approval under this paragraph if all of 28 the following apply to the training: 29 (a) The training is a part of an apprenticeship program 30 registered with the United States department of labor, office 31 of apprenticeship, or the Iowa office of apprenticeship. 32 (b) Each training session lasts no longer than one week. 33 (c) An individual who files a claim for benefits under 34 this subparagraph is limited to one week of such benefits in 35 -8- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 8/ 17 H.F. 2466 a twelve-month period of time. 1 (d) The training is not located at a worksite. 2 DIVISION VII 3 APPRENTICESHIP TRAINING IN SCHOOL DISTRICTS 4 Sec. 19. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Increasing access to 5 apprenticeship training. 6 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 7 requires: 8 a. âApprenticeship sponsorâ , âquality pre-apprenticeship 9 programâ , âregistered apprenticeship programâ , âwork-based 10 learningâ , and âyouth apprenticeshipâ mean the same as defined 11 in section 84D.2. 12 b. âHVACâ means the same as defined in section 105.2. 13 2. The board of directors of each school district is 14 encouraged to establish or expand quality pre-apprenticeship 15 opportunities and youth apprenticeship programs at secondary 16 schools in partnership with apprenticeship sponsors and the 17 Iowa office of apprenticeship. Activities boards may pursue 18 in furtherance of this goal include but are not limited to all 19 of the following: 20 a. Aligning existing industrial technology, construction, 21 electronics, metalwork, and related coursework with 22 requirements of registered apprenticeship programs. 23 b. Establishing new coursework in subjects such as plumbing, 24 HVAC, and math for skilled trades as well as an introductory 25 course on apprenticeships to prepare students for a wide 26 variety of opportunities in registered apprenticeship programs. 27 c. Construction, improvement, or expansion of skilled trade 28 extension centers to provide additional work-based learning 29 opportunities. 30 d. Partnering with apprenticeship sponsors to ensure 31 curricula for coursework described in paragraphs âaâ , âbâ , and 32 âcâ are industry-aligned so that such coursework can be credited 33 toward completion of an apprenticeship. 34 3. The board of directors of each school district is 35 -9- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 9/ 17 H.F. 2466 encouraged to establish a work-based learning coordinator at 1 each secondary school. The work-based learning coordinator 2 shall facilitate implementation of this section and other 3 pre-apprenticeship, apprenticeship, and work-based learning 4 initiatives at the school. A work-based learning coordinator 5 shall have prior experience relevant to implementation of 6 quality pre-apprenticeships, youth apprenticeships, or other 7 work-based learning initiatives. 8 4. The board of directors of each school district is 9 encouraged to pursue funding sources and in-kind contributions 10 through private sector partnerships and from apprenticeship 11 sponsors and nonprofit sources to implement this section. 12 5. It is the intent of the general assembly that school 13 districts implement this section no later than the school year 14 beginning July 1, 2028. 15 DIVISION VIII 16 HIGH-DEMAND JOBS AND SCHOLARSHIP ELIGIBILITY 17 Sec. 20. Section 84A.1B, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 3. Create, and update as necessary every five years , a 20 list of high-demand jobs statewide for purposes of the future 21 ready Iowa registered apprenticeship programs created in 22 chapter 84F , the summer youth intern pilot program established 23 under section 84A.12 , the Iowa employer innovation program 24 established under section 84A.13 , the future ready Iowa skilled 25 workforce last-dollar scholarship program established under 26 section 256.228 , the future ready Iowa skilled workforce grant 27 program established under section 256.229 , and postsecondary 28 summer classes for high school students as provided under 29 section 261E.8, subsection 8 . In addition to the list created 30 by the workforce development board under this subsection , 31 each community college, in consultation with regional career 32 and technical education planning partnerships, and with the 33 approval of the board of directors of the community college, 34 may identify and maintain a list of not more than five regional 35 -10- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 10/ 17 H.F. 2466 high-demand jobs in the community college region, and shall 1 share the lists with the workforce development board. The 2 lists submitted by community colleges under the subsection 3 may be used in that community college region for purposes of 4 programs identified under this subsection . The workforce 5 development board shall have full discretion collaborate 6 with community colleges to select and prioritize statewide 7 high-demand jobs after consulting with business and education 8 stakeholders, as appropriate, and seeking public comment. The 9 workforce development board may add to the list of high-demand 10 jobs as it deems necessary. For purposes of this subsection , 11 âhigh-demand jobâ means a job in the state that the board, or 12 a community college in accordance with this subsection , has 13 identified in accordance with this subsection . In creating 14 a list under this subsection , the following criteria, at a 15 minimum, shall apply: 16 a. An A competitive entry-level hourly wage of not less than 17 fourteen dollars . 18 b. Educational attainment of a qualifying credential up to a 19 bachelorâs degree. 20 c. One or both of the following criteria: 21 (1) Projected annual job openings of at least two hundred 22 fifty or more during the next five years. 23 (2) Annual job growth of at least one percent. 24 Sec. 21. Section 256.228, subsection 1, paragraph g, 25 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 26 (5) Has a student aid index of less than or equal to 27 twenty thousand dollars at the time of initial application, 28 as determined by the application forms submitted pursuant to 29 subparagraph (2), including the free application for federal 30 student aid Meets financial need criteria as established by the 31 commission . 32 Sec. 22. Section 256.228, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 b. Adopt rules under chapter 17A , in collaboration with 35 -11- LSB 6872HV (2) 91 je/jh 11/ 17 H.F. 2466 the department of workforce development, for administration of 1 this section , including but not limited to establishing the 2 duties and responsibilities of eligible institutions under 3 the program; defining residence and satisfactory academic 4 progress for purposes of the program; defining financial need 5 for purposes of the program; and establishing procedures 6 for scholarship application, processing, and approval. The 7 rules shall provide for determining the priority awarding of 8 scholarships if funds available for purposes of this section 9 are insufficient to pay all eligible students. Priority shall 10 be given to fully awarding each eligible student approved for a 11 scholarship rather than to prorating scholarship awards among 12 all eligible students. 13 Sec. 23. Section 256.228, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 14 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 15 lieu thereof the following: 16 d. Transmit to the department of workforce development the 17 compilation of information, data, and statistics compiled under 18 subsection 1, paragraph âeâ , subparagraph (6). 19 DIVISION IX 20 CAREER AND TECHNICAL SECONDARY AUTHORIZATIONS 21 Sec. 24. Section 256.146, subsection 26, Code 2026, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 26. a. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A that allow 24 an individual seeking a career and technical secondary 25 authorization to apply, and, if eligible, be issued the 26 secondary authorization prior to accepting an offer of 27 employment with a school. 28 b. The board shall limit qualifications for an applicant 29 for a career and technical secondary authorization to three 30 thousand hours of recent and relevant experience. The board 31 shall limit training requirements for an initial authorization 32 to ethics training. 33